New York, session 2025-2026, A9282.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the cannabis law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 56 to read as follows: 3 56. "Addiction treatment center" shall mean a facility or program that 4 is: (a) licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the office of 5 addiction services and supports to provide clinical treatment, rehabili- 6 tation, or recovery services to individuals with a substance use disor- 7 der, gambling disorder or other addictive condition; or (b) operated 8 pursuant to the mental hygiene law for the treatment of individuals with 9 mental illness or chemical dependence, including residential, inpatient, 10 outpatient, or medically supervised withdrawal services. For the 11 purposes of this subdivision, "addiction treatment center" shall not 12 include peer support meetings, mutual aid groups, or other non-clinical 13 gatherings not licensed or certified to provide addiction or mental 14 health treatment services under state law. 15 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 72 of the cannabis law is amended to 16 read as follows: 17 6. No cannabis retail licensee shall locate a storefront within five 18 hundred feet of a school grounds as such term is defined in the educa- 19 tion law or within two hundred feet of a house of worship or an 20 addiction treatment center as defined in section three of this chapter. 21 § 3. Subdivision 4 of section 77 of the cannabis law is amended to 22 read as follows: 23 4. No applicant shall be granted an adult-use on-site consumption 24 license for any premises within five hundred feet of school grounds as EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14054-01-5 A. 9282 2 1 such term is defined in the education law or two hundred feet from a 2 house of worship or an addiction treatment center as defined in section 3 three of this chapter. 4 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.